Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-6,110
Acquisition of system; acceptance of funds; administration; powers.

A city of the first class shall have the power by ordinance to acquire, by the exercise of the power of eminent domain or otherwise, lease, purchase, construct, own, maintain, and operate, or contract for the operation of public passenger transportation systems, excluding railroad systems, including all property and facilities required therefor, within and without the limits of the city, to redeem such property from prior encumbrance in order to protect or preserve the interest of the city therein, to exercise all powers granted by the Constitution and laws of the State of Nebraska or exercised by or pursuant to a home rule charter adopted pursuant thereto, including but not limited to receiving and accepting from the government of the United States or any agency thereof, from the State of Nebraska, or any subdivision thereof, and from any person or corporation, donations, devises, gifts, bequests, loans, or grants for or in aid of the acquisition, operation, and maintenance of such public passenger transportation systems, and to administer, hold, use, and apply the same for the purposes for which such donations, devises, gifts, bequests, loans, or grants may have been made, to negotiate with employees and enter into contracts of employment, to employ by contract or otherwise individuals singularly or collectively, to enter into agreements authorized under the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act, to contract with an operating and management company for the purpose of operating, servicing, and maintaining any public passenger transportation systems any such city shall acquire under the provisions of sections 16-6,110 and 75-303, and to exercise such other and further powers with respect thereto as may be necessary, incident, or appropriate to the powers of such city.

Laws 1973, LB 345, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 395, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 61.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.